Washington statutes.
RCW 6.28.020

Contents of deed.

The deed of the commissioner shall so refer to the judgment authorizing the conveyance, that the same may be readily found, but need not recite the record in the case generally.

[Code 1881 s 529; 1877 p 112 s 533; 1854 p 205 s 391; RRS s 606.]